Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1844.01
Pamphlet on rights and procedures; distribution.

(1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall create a pamphlet or document that contains the following information:

(a) A brief statement of the procedural steps of a criminal case;

(b) The rights and procedures under sections 81-1843 to 81-1851;

(c) Suggested procedures if the victim or the victim's immediate family is subjected to acts or threats of physical violence or intimidation by the defendant or at the direction of the defendant; and

(d) The availability of victim's compensation awards and the address of the Crime Victim's Reparations Committee.

(2) Not later than seventy-two hours after arraignment of the defendant for the crime, the county attorney shall distribute to the victim, as defined in section 81-1848, the pamphlet or document of victim's rights created by the commission pursuant to this section.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB1181, § 5.
July 18, 2026